Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.260

Streets—Annual report to secretary of transportation.

The governing authority of each city and town on or before May 31st of each year shall submit such records and reports regarding street operations in the city or town to the secretary of transportation on forms furnished by him or her as are necessary to enable him or her to compile an annual report thereon.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2042; 1999 c 204 s 1; 1984 c 7 s 19; 1977 c 75 s 29; 1965 c 7 s 35.21.260. Prior: 1943 c 82 s 12; 1937 c 187 s 64; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-64.]